Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-259
Authority; purchase bonds of authority; canceled; price.

Subject to such agreements with bondholders as then exist, the authority may, out of any funds available therefor, purchase bonds of the authority which shall thereupon be canceled at any reasonable price which, if the bonds are then redeemable, shall not exceed the redemption price then applicable plus accrued interest to the next interest payment on such bonds.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 59;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 58.